Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1669.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1512.2. Free-Play Recess.--(a) Each school board shall provide at least thirty minutes of supervised, safe and unstructured free-play recess each day for each student in kindergarten through grade five, subject to the following:(1) Students shall not be permitted to replace free-play recess with additional coursework or instruction unless requested by the student.(2) Free-play recess shall not be withheld, in whole or 12345678910111213141516171819 part, for punitive reasons or as a make-up period for missed work, extra credit or testing.(3) School entities shall direct free-play recess to take place outside as weather, facilities and other circumstances allow.(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit school entity staff from denying recess for a student on the advice of a medical professional or school nurse or based on the provisions of a student's individualized education program under the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (Public Law 91-230, 20 U.S.C. § 1400 et seq.) or 29 U.S.C. § 794 (relating to nondiscrimination under Federal grants and programs) . (c) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Free-play recess" means a period of time during the regular school day, exclusive of time provided for meals, during which a student is given a break from structured classroom instruction and an opportunity to engage in physical activity, unstructured play or social interaction with other pupils. The term does not include a period of physical education under section 1512.1."School entity" means a school district, intermediate unit, area career and technical school, charter school, regional charter school or cyber charter school.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1669PN2034 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425